src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON OT-PASSIVE_GILVI
! The first two entries from DOHPPE
! CIRROStem ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
!< "@P.Px.add@" "+Der4":» "+Der/NomAct":m "+N":0 "+Use/-Spell":0 > PRE_BOAHTALADDAN ;
 +Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-PLX:»mušš MUSH ;
 +Der1+Der/meahttun+A+Err/Orth:»X7#meahttu MEAHTTUN ;
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
! DOHPPEINCH ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/InchL, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Use/NG:šgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 :j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +Imprt:%>Y5 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»Y5n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»Y5ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»Y5mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»Y5ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mat K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»Y5mak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen:»Y5mijd R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijdda K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»Y5mijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijgujn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»Y5mij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijddi%> PxVvowch ;  !not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijddi%> PxVvowch ;  !not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijddás%> PxC ;	    !not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijnni%> PxVvowch ;  !not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !not likely
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV2 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Inf:%>Y5t K ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>Y5n K ;
 +Actio+Gen:%>Y5n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5me K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:%>Y5min K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:%>Y5men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:%>Y5mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:%>Y5mijn K ;
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
! The entry leading to PASSIVE in DOHPPE is omitted here.
! The next entries are the non-passive partS of the DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE entry.
 +Der1+Der/st+V:st BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:stalla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:stadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/st+V:stasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:steasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+TV:h BASSO-MUITAL ;
! +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:halla%> BOAHTIStem ;
! +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:hadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/st+V:hasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:heasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:d BASSO-MUITAL ;





!! ## Basic lexica for trisyllabic verbs
!!! 1. DEFAULT SECTION
!   -------------------------


LEXICON MUITAL_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyllabic Verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsMUITAL ;


LEXICON ALIST_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsALIST ;







!! ###  Basic lexica for trisyllabic verbs
!!! 2. SPECIAL SECTION:
!   2a. Impersonals
!   2b. already derived words
!   2c. lexicas tweaked (mostly) for speller reasons
!   2d. other special lexicas
!   ----------------------------------------------



!   2a. Impersonals
!   ----------------------------------------------

LEXICON COASKKIT_IV   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Trisyllabic impersonals
 COASKKITCnj ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsCOASKKIT ;



LEXICON ARVVASJ_IV   !!≈ * **@CODE@** impersonals ending -šit, -skit, smit, -idit, -ldit, -git and 5-syllables
 COASKKITCnj ;

LEXICON ARVIL_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Impersonal Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit
 COASKKITCnj ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsARVIL ;








!   2b. already derived words
!   ----------------------------------------------


LEXICON MUITTASJ_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Words ending -šit, -skit, -ldit - Reciprocals on -dit, Momentatives on -dit, -ádit, -ihit, -e7hit, Frequentatives on -(u)hit, Continuatives on -nit, Inchoatives on -nit
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> MUITTASJStem ;

LEXICON HALIID_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Words ending -smit, -idit, -git
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> MUITTASJStem ;
 +V+Der2+Der/Caus+V+TV+:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON BONJAT_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Cont/Freq on -dit, Continuatives on -(u)hit, Reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> MUITALStem ;

LEXICON VUORDIL_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit, -rit with Personal Passive
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsVUORDIL ;

LEXICON BEAGASJ_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Words ending -šit, -skit -ldit, essive derivates on -hit -. !Reciprocals on -dit. Momentatives on -dit, -ádit, -ihit, -e7hit. Frequentatives on -(u)hit. Continuatives on -nit. Inchoatives in -nit
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:%> BEAGASJStem ;

LEXICON JORGGIID_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Words ending -smit, -idit, -git -
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:%> BEAGASJStem ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/Caus+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON HURAI_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Words ending -aidit
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll: HURAIStem ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/Caus+V+TV:d»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;


LEXICON BALAT_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** !Cont/Freq on -dit, Continuatives on -(u)hit, Reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:%> ALISTStem ;

LEXICON SUOTNJAL_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit, -rit without Personal Passive
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL ;

LEXICON BOTNJAS_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyllabic Verbs ending -sit without Personal Passive
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:%> MUITALINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOTNJAS ;
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll: DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON LASSAN_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyllabic Verbs ending -nit without Personal Passive IV
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:%> MUITALINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsLASSAN ;
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll: DeverbalNounsC ;




!   2c. lexicas tweaked (mostly) for speller reasons
!   ----------------------------------------------

LEXICON OAHPAHIT_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** only oahpahit, disamb reasons?
 +V+TV+Gram/3syll:%> OAHPAHITStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsMUITAL ;

LEXICON NUOSKIT_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** only nuoskidit, for speller, no action noun nuoskideapmi
 +V+IV+Gram/3syll:%> NUOSKITStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsALIST ;
