src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
dadjalit:dadjal VUORDIL_TV ;
darvánit+Err/Orth-a-á:darvan LASSAN_IV ;
dipmadit:dipmad MUITAL_TV ;
dovddiidit:dovddijd HALIID_TV ;
dovddiidit+Err/Orth:dovddid HALIID_TV ;
duvddašit:duvddaš MUITTASJ_TV ;
dáhkidit:dáhkid BONJAT_TV ;
fierralit+v2:vierral SUOTNJAL_IV ;
fiskkodit:fiskkod ALIST_IV ;
gakculit:gakcul VUORDIL_TV ;
gavccádit:gavccád BEAGASJ_IV ;
skielgguhit:skielgguh BALAT_IV ;
geažuhit:geažuh MUITAL_TV ;
guovlladit:guovllad BONJAT_TV ;
huikkašit:huikkaš MUITTASJ_TV ;
hágganit:hággan LASSAN_IV ;
háliidit:hálijd HALIID_TV ;
illudit:illud ALIST_IV ;
irgalit:irgal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
juolludit:juollud MUITAL_TV ;
lihkkasit:lihkkas BOTNJAS_IV ;
luoikalit:luojkal VUORDIL_TV ;
manadit:manad BALAT_IV ;
morránit:morrán LASSAN_IV ;
máraidit:máraj HURAI_IV ;
nivkkuhit:nivkkuh MUITTASJ_TV ;
njáhkalit:njáhkal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
nuoskidit:nuoskid NUOSKIT_IV ;
nájadit:nájad MUITAL_TV ;
oahpahit:oahpah OAHPAHIT_TV ;
oahpahit+Err/Orth:oahpa OAHPAHIT_TV ;
okkodit:okkod BONJAT_TV ;
oktiibeaškkihit:oktii#beaškkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
rámiidit:rámijd HALIID_TV ;
sibildit+v2:sivild MUITTASJ_TV ;
suhtadit:suhtad BALAT_IV ;
sáhčalit:sáhčal VUORDIL_TV ;
sázastit:sázast MUITAL_TV ;
vearránit+Err/Orth-a-á:vearran LASSAN_IV ;
vileštit:vilešt ALIST_IV ;
vádjolit:vádjol SUOTNJAL_IV ;
čievččastit:čievččast MUITAL_TV ;
čoavdilit:čoavdil VUORDIL_TV ;
čohkánit+Err/Orth-a-á:čohkkan LASSAN_IV ;
čolgadit:čolgad MUITTASJ_TV ;
šuohkihit+Err/Orth:šuohke7h BEAGASJ_IV ;
čárvvodit:čárvvod BONJAT_TV ;
stuorrulit:stuorrul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
almmáskit:almmásk ARVVASJ_IV ;
bilaidit:bilaj HURAI_IV ;
dálkkáskit:dálkkásk ARVVASJ_IV ;
jieppadit:jieppad BALAT_IV ;
nallasit:nallas BOTNJAS_IV ;
áššečuoččuhit:ášše#čuoččuh MUITAL_TV ;
searvidit:searvid ALIST_IV ;
oahpásmit:oahpásm JORGGIID_IV ;
geamppasmit:geamppasm JORGGIID_IV ;
moskkosmit:moskkosm JORGGIID_IV ;
vuogasmit:vuogasm JORGGIID_IV ;
galmmašit:galmmaš MUITTASJ_TV ;
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
bohtanit+Err/Orth:bohttan LASSAN_IV ;
arvilit:arvil ARVIL_IV ;
arvvašit:arvvaš ARVVASJ_IV ;
arvvistit:arvvist COASKKIT_IV ;
arvváskit:arvvásk ARVVASJ_IV ;
bahčagit:bahčag JORGGIID_IV ;
bardilit:bardil VUORDIL_TV ;
basášit:basáš BEAGASJ_IV ;
beađadit:beađad BONJAT_TV ;
bieggalit:bieggal ARVIL_IV ;
biekkastit:biekkast COASKKIT_IV ;
bindulit:bindul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
biškkodit:biškkod BALAT_IV ;
boalčasit:boalčas BOTNJAS_IV ;
bonistit:bonist MUITAL_TV ;
burgilit:burgil VUORDIL_TV ;
báhkašit:báhkaš MUITTASJ_TV ;
báhraidit:báhraj HURAI_IV ;
báládit:bálád BEAGASJ_IV ;
bázestit:báze7st ALIST_IV ;
coabmasit:coabmas BOTNJAS_IV ;
cohkkodit:cohkkod BALAT_IV ;
cuilalit:cujlal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
cuoŋudit:cuoŋud COASKKIT_IV ;
cáiccagit:cájccag JORGGIID_IV ;
dajahastalit:dajahastal BONJAT_TV ;
deaškanit:deaškan LASSAN_IV ;
diraidit:diraj HURAI_IV ;
doahpulit:doahpul VUORDIL_TV ;
duhppádit+Err/Lex:duhppád MUITTASJ_TV ; ! !XXXDon´t know meaning of this
dulvváskit:dulvvásk ARVVASJ_IV ;
dáikkáskit:dájkkásk BEAGASJ_IV ;
eaiggádastalit:eajggádastal BONJAT_TV ;
eaškálit:eaškál SUOTNJAL_IV ;
ellosit:ellos BOTNJAS_IV ;
firtestit+v1:firtest COASKKIT_IV ;
fálbmebealástit:fálbme7#bealást ALIST_IV ;
gearadit:gearad BALAT_IV ;
giekcasit:giekcas BOTNJAS_IV ;
gobmidit:gobmid COASKKIT_IV ;
goikkahit:gojkkah MUITAL_TV ;
golbmánit:golbmán LASSAN_IV ;
gumaidit:gumaj HURAI_IV ;
guhpiidit:guhpijd JORGGIID_IV ;
guorbbuhit:guorbbuh BALAT_IV ;
guppuštit:guppušt ALIST_IV ;
gurggehit:gurgge7h BEAGASJ_IV ;
guđodit:guđod BONJAT_TV ;
gárgalit:gárgal VUORDIL_TV ;
gáskkiidit:gáskkijd HALIID_TV ;
hieimmastit:hiejmmast COASKKIT_IV ;
hievganit:hievgan LASSAN_IV ;
háikkašit:hájkkaš MUITTASJ_TV ;
hálssagit:hálssag JORGGIID_IV ;
jaraidit:jaraj HURAI_IV ;
laktásit+Err/Orth-a-á:láktas BOTNJAS_IV ; !
leabastit:leabast ALIST_IV ;! to speed according to sponsors
leappehit:leappe7h BEAGASJ_IV ;
loahkehit:loahke7h COASKKIT_IV ;
loikkiidit:lojkkijd JORGGIID_IV ;
lokkodit:lokkod BONJAT_TV ;
luojaidit:luojaj HURAI_IV ;
megodit:megod BALAT_IV ;
moddjilit:moddjil SUOTNJAL_IV ;
muohtašit:muohtaš ARVVASJ_IV ;
murkkudit:murkkud COASKKIT_IV ;
máddánit:máddán LASSAN_IV ;
máŋgehit:máŋgeh MUITAL_TV ;
nimmurdit:nimmurd ALIST_IV ;
njavččagit:njavččag JORGGIID_IV ;
njaŋgasit:njaŋgas BOTNJAS_IV ;
njeaidalit:njeajdal VUORDIL_TV ;
njulggodit:njulggod BONJAT_TV ;
noađđádit:noađđád MUITTASJ_TV ;
ravggihit:ravggih BEAGASJ_IV ;
rinččistit+Err/Orth:rinžžist ALIST_IV ; !
rišadit:rišad BALAT_IV ;
rišaidit:rišaj HURAI_IV ;
rohtiidit:rohtijd HALIID_TV ;
rohttásit:rohttás BOTNJAS_IV ;
ruđgalit:ruđgal VUORDIL_TV ;
rášudit:rášud COASKKIT_IV ;
sevddiidit:sevddijd JORGGIID_IV ;
sevttodit:sevttod BONJAT_TV ;
skoabaidit:skoabaj HURAI_IV ;
skájaidit:skájaj HURAI_IV ;
skálkkihit:skálkkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
soktudit:soktud MUITAL_TV ;
spánastit:spánast ALIST_IV ;
stoavkkuhit:stoavkkuh MUITTASJ_TV ;
stulčalit:stulčal BONJAT_TV ;
suonjadit:suonjad BALAT_IV ;
vabaidit:vabaj HURAI_IV ;
vaspalit:vaspal VUORDIL_TV ;
vatnalit:vatnal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
veanzasit:veanzas BOTNJAS_IV ;
veiggodit:vejggod COASKKIT_IV ;
vilppihit:vilppih BEAGASJ_IV ;
vuoissihit:vuojssih COASKKIT_IV ;
árranit:árran LASSAN_IV ;
šealdadit:šealdad ALIST_IV ;
čivrragit:čivrrag JORGGIID_IV ;
šlahtádit:šlahtád COASKKIT_IV ;
šnjalžžuhit:šnjalžžuh BALAT_IV ;
čoahraidit:čoahraj HURAI_IV ;
čoaskulit:čoaskul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
čuoimmádit:čuojmmád BEAGASJ_IV ;
čuolddašit:čuolddaš MUITTASJ_TV ;
čuoldásit:čuoldás BOTNJAS_IV ;
čárvvastit:čárvvast MUITAL_TV ;
čáđggašit:čáđggaš ARVVASJ_IV ;
